lang/common/courses/xfst-lexc/2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+Gram/IV
+TUSSAA
+Der/vv
t2

LEXICON Root
aala IV_voq_stem ;

LEXICON IV_voq_stem
+Gram/IV: Der_vv_IV ;

LEXICON Der_vv_IV
 0:%>  Der_vv_IV_additive ;

LEXICON Der_vv_IV_additive
+TUSSAA+Der/vv:t2ussaa IV-mod_V ;

LEXICON IV-mod_V
# ;
